Alabama, session 2026rs, SB115.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
Section 1. Section 41-16-52.1 is added to the Code of
Alabama 1975, to read as follows:
§41-16-52.1
(a) For purposes of this section, the term "awarding
authority" means any county commission, governing body of a
municipality, or an instrumentality of a county or
municipality, including a waterworks board, a sewer board, a
gas board, and other like utility boards and commissions.
(b) All expenditures of funds, made by or on the behalf
of any awarding authority, for repair parts and the repair of
vehicles shall be made at the option of the awarding authority
without regard to this article when the following conditions
are met:
(1) The vehicle has a gross vehicle weight rating of
12,000 pounds or less.
(2) The incident of repair does not involve more than
fifteen thousand dollars ($15,000).
(3) The awarding authority solicits and documents price
estimates from at least two different vendors prior to
awarding the contract.
Page 1

awarding the contract.
SB115 Enrolled
(c) The exemption provided under this section shall
apply to each vehicle repaired, and the exempted expenditure
shall not be aggregated with the expenditures of any other
incidents of repair.
(d)(1) The option provided by subsection (b) may be
exercised by the awarding authority by specific reference to
this section on any purchase orders and purchase commitments
executed by the awarding authority.
(2) The option shall not be exercised by any employee,
agent, or servant unless done so after having received
official prior approval of the respective awarding authority
or unless exercised pursuant to a formal policy adopted by the
awarding authority setting out conditions and restrictions
under which the option shall be exercised.
Section 2. This act shall become effective on October
1, 2026.
Page 2

1, 2026.
SB115 Enrolled






________________________________________________
President and Presiding Officer of the Senate



________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Representatives


SB115
Senate 21-Jan-26
I hereby certify that the within Act originated in and passed
the Senate.

Patrick Harris,
Secretary.




House of Representatives
Passed: 10-Feb-26




By: Senator Coleman-Madison
Page 3